Hawaii statutes.
[§324-5]
Multidisciplinary and multiagency reviews. The department of health may
conduct multidisciplinary and multiagency reviews of maternal deaths to reduce
the incidence of preventable maternal deaths. [L 2016, c 203, pt of §5]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next